Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-717
City treasurer; books and accounts.

The city treasurer shall receive all money belonging to the city, and the clerk and treasurer shall keep their books and accounts in such a manner as the mayor and council shall prescribe. The treasurer shall keep a daily cash book, which shall be footed and balanced daily; and such books and accounts shall always be subject to inspection of the mayor, members of the council, and such other persons as they may designate.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 88, p. 295;

R.S.1913, § 4983;

C.S.1922, § 4152;

C.S.1929, § 16-714;

R.S.1943, § 16-717.